California statutes. Education Code
Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 19976, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19976.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the money in the Pooled Money Investment Account during the time the money was withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19976.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

19977.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has by resolution authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19978.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval by the electors of the state for the issuance of bonds shall include the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19979.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19980.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 96.   Effective January 1, 2007.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, and approved in Prop. 85 on Nov. 8, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

19981.

An amount not to exceed 1 percent of the fund may be used by the State Librarian for costs of administering this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 49, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 85 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. California Reading and Literacy Improvement and Public Library Construction and Renovation Bond Act of 2000 [19985. - 20011.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [19985. - 19986.]

19985.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Reading and Literacy Improvement and Public Library Construction and Renovation Bond Act of 2000.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19985.5.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Reading and literacy skills are fundamental to success in our economy and our society.

(b) The Legislature and Governor have made enormous strides in improving the quality of reading instruction in public schools.

(c) Public libraries are an important resource to further California’s reading and literacy goals both in conjunction with the public schools and for the adult population.

(d) The construction and renovation of public library facilities is necessary to expand access to reading and literacy programs in California’s public education system and to expand access to public library services for all residents of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19986.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Committee” means the California Library Construction and Renovation Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 19972.

(b) “Fund” means the California Public Library Construction and Renovation Fund.

(c) “Board” means the California Public Library Construction and Renovation Board. This board is comprised of the State Librarian, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, an Assembly Member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, a Senator appointed by the Senate Rules Committee, and a member appointed by the Governor.

Legislative members of the board shall meet with, and participate in, the work of the board to the extent that their participation is not incompatible with their duties as Members of the Legislature. For the purposes of this chapter, Members of the Legislature who are members of the board shall constitute a joint legislative committee on the subject matter of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Provisions [19987. - 19999.]

19987.

The proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be deposited in the California Public Library Construction and Renovation Fund, which is hereby established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19988.

All moneys deposited in the fund, except as provided in Section 20011, are continuously appropriated to the State Librarian, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, and shall be available for grants to any city, county, city and county, or district that is authorized at the time of the project application to own and maintain a public library facility for the purposes set forth in Section 19989.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19989.

The grant funds authorized pursuant to Section 19988, and the matching funds provided pursuant to Section 19995, shall be used by the recipient for any of the following purposes:

(a) Acquisition or construction of new facilities or additions to existing public library facilities.

(b) Acquisition of land necessary for the purposes of subdivision (a).

(c) Remodeling or rehabilitation of existing public library facilities or of other facilities for the purpose of their conversion to public library facilities. All remodeling and rehabilitation projects funded with grants authorized pursuant to this chapter shall include any necessary upgrading of electrical and telecommunications systems to accommodate Internet and similar computer technology.

(d) Procurement or installation, or both, of furnishings and equipment required to make a facility fully operable, if the procurement or installation is part of a construction or remodeling project funded pursuant to this section.

(e) Payment of fees charged by architects, engineers, and other professionals, whose services are required to plan or execute a project authorized pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19990.

Any grant funds authorized pursuant to Section 19988, or matching funds provided pursuant to Section 19995, may not be used by a recipient for any of the following purposes:

(a) Books and other library materials.

(b) Administrative costs of the project, including, but not limited to, the costs of any of the following:

(1) Preparation of the grant application.

(2) Procurement of matching funds.

(3) Conduct of an election for obtaining voter approval of the project.

(c) Interest or other carrying charges for financing the project, including, but not limited to, costs of loans or lease-purchase agreements in excess of the direct costs of any of the authorized purposes specified in Section 19989.

(d) Any ongoing operating expenses for the facility, its personnel, supplies, or any other library operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19991.

All construction contracts for projects funded in part through grants awarded pursuant to this chapter shall be awarded through competitive bidding pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 20100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19992.

This chapter shall be administered by the State Librarian. The board shall adopt rules, regulations, and policies for the implementation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19993.

A city, county, city and county, or district may apply to the State Librarian for a grant pursuant to this chapter, as follows:

(a) Each application shall be for a project for a purpose authorized by Section 19989.

(b) An application may not be submitted for a project for which construction bids already have been advertised.

(c) The applicant shall request not less than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19994.

(a) The State Librarian shall consider applications for construction of new public library facilities submitted pursuant to Section 19993 in the following priority order:

(1) First priority shall be given to joint use projects in which the agency that operates the library and one or more school districts have a cooperative agreement.

(2) Second priority shall be given to all other public library projects.

(b) The State Librarian shall consider applications for remodeling or rehabilitation of existing public library facilities pursuant to Section 19993 in the following priority order:

(1) First priority shall be given to public library projects in the attendance areas of public schools that are determined, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, to have inadequate infrastructure to support access to computers and other educational technology.

(2) Second priority shall be given to all other projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19995.

(a) Each grant recipient shall provide matching funds from any available source in an amount equal to 35 percent of the costs of the project. The remaining 65 percent of the costs of the project, up to a maximum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) per project, shall be provided through allocations from the fund.

(b) Qualifying matching funds shall be cash expenditures in the categories specified in Section 19989 which are made not earlier than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian. Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (c), in-kind expenditures do not qualify as matching funds.

(c) Land donated or otherwise acquired for use as a site for the facility, including, but not limited to, land purchased more than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian, may be credited towards the 35 percent matching funds requirement at its appraised value as of the date of the application. This subdivision shall not apply to land acquired with funds authorized pursuant to Part 68 (commencing with Section 100400).

(d) Architect fees for plans and drawings for library renovation and new construction, including, but not limited to, plans and drawings purchased more than three years prior to the submission of the application to the State Librarian, may be credited towards the 35 percent matching funds requirement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19996.

(a) The estimated costs of a project for which an application is submitted shall be consistent with normal public construction costs in the applicant’s area.

(b) An applicant wishing to construct a project having costs that exceed normal public construction costs in the area may apply for a grant in an amount not to exceed 65 percent of the normal costs up to a maximum of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) per project if the applicant certifies that it is capable of financing the remainder of the project costs from other sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19997.

Once an application has been approved by the board and included in the State Librarian’s request to the committee, the amount of the funding to be provided to the applicant may not be increased. Any actual changes in project costs are the full responsibility of the applicant. If the amount of funding that is provided is greater than the cost of the project, the applicant shall return that portion of the funding that exceeds the cost of the project to the fund. If an applicant has been awarded funding by the board, but chooses not to proceed with the project, the applicant shall return all of the funding to the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19998.

(a) In reviewing applications, as part of establishing the priorities set forth in Section 19994 the board shall consider all of the following factors:

(1) Needs of urban and rural areas.

(2) Population growth.

(3) Age and condition of the existing library facility.

(4) The degree to which the existing library facility is inadequate in meeting the needs of the residents in the library service area and the degree to which the proposed project responds to the needs of those residents.

(5) The degree to which the library’s plan of service integrates appropriate electronic technologies into the proposed project.

(6) The degree to which the proposed site is appropriate for the proposed project and its intended use.

(7) The financial capacity of the local agency submitting the application to open and maintain operation of the proposed library for applications for the construction of new public libraries.

(b) If, after an application has been submitted, material changes occur that would alter the evaluation of an application, the State Librarian may accept an additional written statement from the applicant for consideration by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

19999.

(a) A facility, or the part thereof, acquired, constructed, or remodeled, or rehabilitated with grants received pursuant to this chapter shall be dedicated to public library direct service use for a period of not less than 20 years following completion of the project.

(b) The interest of the state in land or a facility, or both, pursuant to the funding of a project under this chapter, as described in subdivision (a), may be transferred by the State Librarian from the land or facility, or both, for which that funding was granted to a replacement site and facility acquired or constructed for the purpose of providing public library direct service.

(c) If the facility, or any part thereof, acquired, constructed, remodeled, or habilitated with grants received pursuant to this chapter ceases to be used for public library direct service prior to the expiration of the period specified in subdivision (a), the board is entitled to recover, from the grant recipient or the recipient’s successor in the maintenance of the facility, an amount that bears the same ratio to the value of the facility, or the appropriate part thereof, at the time it ceased to be used for public library direct service as the amount of the grant bore to the cost of the facility or the appropriate part thereof. For purposes of this subdivision, the value of the facility, or the appropriate part thereof, is determined by the mutual agreement of the board and the grant recipient or successor, or through an action brought for that purpose in the superior court.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (f) of Section 16724 of the Government Code, any money recovered pursuant to subdivision (c) shall be deposited in the fund, and shall be available for the purpose of awarding grants for other projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [20000. - 20011.]

20000.

Bonds in the amount of three hundred forty-four million nine hundred sixty thousand dollars ($344,960,000), excluding refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold for deposit in the fund to be used in accordance with, and for carrying out the purposes of, this chapter, and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the state, and the full faith and credit of the state is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of and interest on bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 255, Sec. 3.   (AB 184)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

20001.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20002.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, the California Library Construction and Renovation Finance Committee established pursuant to Section 19972 is the “committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the California Public Library Construction and Renovation Board established pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 19986 is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20003.

The committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in this chapter, including all acts amendatory thereof and supplementary thereto, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20004.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of and interest on the bonds each year. It is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act that is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20005.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of and interest on bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum necessary to carry out Section 20006, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20006.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that have been authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund, with interest at the rate earned by the money in the Pooled Money Investment Account during the time the money was withdrawn from the General Fund pursuant to this section, from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20007.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds that the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. The board shall execute any documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20008.

Any bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter may be refunded by the issuance of refunding bonds in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of Chapter 4 of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Approval of the electors of the state for the issuance of bonds under this chapter shall include the approval of the issuance of any bonds issued to refund any bonds originally issued or any previously issued refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20009.

All money deposited in the fund that is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold pursuant to this chapter shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20010.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------

20011.

Amounts deposited in the fund pursuant to this chapter may be appropriated in the annual Budget Act to the State Librarian for the actual amount of office, personnel, and other customary and usual expenses incurred in the direct administration of grant projects pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, expenses incurred by the State Librarian in providing technical assistance to an applicant for a grant under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 726, Sec. 1.   Approved in Proposition 14 at the March 7, 2000, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. California Cultural and Historical Endowment Act [20050. - 20092.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [20050. - 20052.5.]

20050.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Cultural and Historical Endowment Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20051.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) Every civilization defines itself in part by its past, and an understanding of its past helps determine its basic values and future aspirations. Understanding of the past is strengthened and deepened through contact with the buildings, physical places, and artifacts of earlier times. Through learning this past, our young and future generations come to better understand the society in which they live and to better understand themselves.

(b) As America’s physical culture and built environment become remarkably similar throughout the country, it is left to the natural environment and the structures of the past to give a unique sense of place to our communities. Preserving these structures is becoming increasingly compelling as the homogeneity of our physical culture increases.

(c) The buildings, other structures, and artifacts that embody California’s past are in escalating danger of being redeveloped, remodeled, renovated, paved, excavated, bulldozed, modernized, and lost forever.

(d) For history to be part of our lives, we must include it in our daily lives, through the adaptive reuse of historic structures in our older commercial districts and inner cities.

(e) California has one of the most diverse populations on earth and its cultural and historic preservation program should reflect that fact. Early cultural and historic preservation efforts often focused on the structures and activities of our European ancestors. Without minimizing their contribution, it is important to pursue other historical threads that are important to California’s Latino population, to African-Americans, to Asians and Pacific Islanders, to Native Americans, to Jewish persons, and to many other groups of peoples with uniquely identifiable cultures and histories. It is increasingly important to preserve the physical and cultural history and folklife of these many groups’ presence and contributions to California’s history.

(f) Historic preservation should include the contributions of all Californians. The study of history once focused largely on the actions and works of wealthy, powerful, noble, brilliant, or famous persons. More recently, historians have tried to increase understanding of how more ordinary people lived and thought. California’s historic preservation efforts should allow its citizens and visitors to experience something of the physical world of both.

(g) In 1997, California’s Statewide Historic Preservation Plan was prepared pursuant to the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 and includes seven statewide goals, including the goal to promote the preservation and stewardship of cultural resources among a diversified state population representing all levels of the socioeconomic spectrum.

(h) California’s retained past certainly includes sites important to its prehistoric and later Native American people, and the remaining great structures of the 19th century. But the state also needs to consciously preserve selected remnants of the 1930s, of California’s great role in World War II, as well as representative structures and sites that were culturally or economically important during the 1950s, 1960s, and, in some cases, even more recently.

(i) California’s historic missions are among California’s most evocative historical structures. Their continued protection and restoration should continue to have high priority.

(j) California’s museums are among the most important and cherished repositories of the state’s cultural and historical heritage.

(k) California’s partnerships with federal, state, and local governmental agencies and nonprofit organizations have helped us understand the range and diversity of California’s history and historic and cultural resources and artifacts and have helped develop a better understanding of the educational, environmental, and economic benefits of, and tools available for, the preservation and interpretation of historic and cultural resources and artifacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20052.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Development” includes, but is not limited to, improvement, rehabilitation, restoration, enhancement, preservation, protection, and interpretation.

(b) “Endowment” means the California Cultural and Historical Endowment created pursuant to Section 20053, or the board of the endowment, as appropriate.

(c) “Museum” means a public or private nonprofit institution that is organized on a permanent basis for essentially educational or aesthetic purposes and that owns or uses tangible objects, cares for those objects, and exhibits them to the general public on a regular basis.

(d) “Nonprofit organization” means any nonprofit public benefit corporation that is formed pursuant to the Nonprofit Corporation Law (commencing with Section 500 of the Corporations Code), qualified to do business in California, and qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, that has, among its principal charitable purposes, the preservation of historic or cultural resources for cultural, scientific, historic, educational, recreational, agricultural, or scenic opportunities.

(e) “Preservation” includes, but is not limited to, identification, evaluation, recordation, restoration, stabilization, development, and reconstruction, or any combination of those activities.

(f) “Public agency” means a federal agency, state agency, city, county, district, association of governments, joint powers agency, or tribal organization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20052.5.

It is the intent of the Legislature that consideration be given to the transferring and fully integrating the Office of Historic Preservation with the California Cultural and Historical Endowment, which is created pursuant to this chapter, for the following purposes:

(a) To increase the stature, visibility, authority, and entrepreneurial capabilities of the Office of Historic Preservation in the interest of helping it carry out its missions and purposes.

(b) To allow the California Cultural and Historical Endowment to benefit from the Office of Historic Preservation’s experience and expertise, and from the experience and expertise of its constituents and supporters.

(c) To synergistically increase the state’s effective commitment to historic and cultural preservation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Creation and Powers of the Endowment [20053. - 20060.]

20053.

(a) There is in the Natural Resources Agency the California Cultural and Historical Endowment, consisting of the following 10 members:

(1) The Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency, who shall serve as chair of the endowment, or his or her designee.

(2) The State Librarian, or his or her designee.

(3) The Director of Finance, or his or her designee.

(4) Three members appointed by the Governor.

(5) Two members
 appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(6) Two members appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(b) Two Members of the Senate, appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and two Members of the Assembly, appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly, shall meet with the endowment and participate in its activities to the extent that such participation is not incompatible with their respective positions as Members of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 590, Sec. 1.   (AB 482)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

20054.

(a) Appointments to the endowment made pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 20053 shall be persons with distinguished achievements in the fields of California history and culture, including, but not limited to, persons with distinguished achievements in the field of California history, historic preservation, architectural history, historical museum design and operation, California artistic history, prehistory, archaeology, or in the cultural achievements of the diverse ethnic and other groups comprising California’s population, including the native peoples of California.

(b) Appointments to the endowment made pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 20053 shall be representative of the diverse ethnic and other groups comprising California’s population, and shall be geographically balanced.

(c) The members appointed pursuant to paragraphs (4), (5), and (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 20053 shall serve at the pleasure of his or her appointing authority. Members appointed under these paragraphs of subdivision (a) of Section 20053 shall be compensated for attendance at regular meetings of the endowment at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per day, and shall be reimbursed for the actual and necessary expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in the performance of their duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20056.

If any member of the endowment is an employee, director, or officer of any organization that has applied to the endowment for a grant, that member shall not communicate with any other member of the endowment or any member of any advisory panel regarding the grant application and the member shall not be present when the application is considered by the endowment or advisory panel.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20057.

(a) A majority of the total authorized membership of the endowment shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business under this chapter.

(b) The endowment may adopt regulations as necessary or convenient for carrying out the purposes of this chapter, including, but not limited to, establishing grant application criteria and procedures. Before adopting regulations for grant application criteria and procedures, the endowment shall conduct public hearings throughout the state and shall invite persons from diverse groups and ethnic backgrounds to share their input on the matter.

(c) The endowment may hold hearings, execute agreements, and perform any acts necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The endowment may select and contract with other state agencies and with private entities, including nonprofit organizations, museums and individuals to provide services necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20058.

The endowment shall determine the qualifications of, and it shall appoint and fix the salary of, the executive officer of the endowment, who shall be exempt from civil service, and shall appoint such other staff as may be necessary to carry out the powers and functions set forth in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20059.

The endowment may appoint one or more advisory committees as it determines to be useful to its work. Members of advisory committees shall serve without compensation, but each may be reimbursed for necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the performance of official duties.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1126, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

20060.
